Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2320.01
Locator; training required.

Any locator acting as a contractor for an operator to perform location services shall be trained in locator standards and practices applicable to the industry. The board of directors may review locator training materials provided by operators, locators, and excavators and may make recommendations regarding best practices for locators, if deemed appropriate.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 9.